Missouri, session 2026, HB2127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.945, to read as follows:
191.945. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Cindi's Law".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Endometrial sample", tissue collected from the uterine lining for diagnostic
purposes;
(2) "p53 test", a test used to detect the presence and pattern of abnormalities in
the p53 protein in tissue samples that indicates the invasiveness, severity, and prognosis
for various cancers.
3. A p53 test shall be performed on all abnormal cytological or histological
endometrial samples for purposes of diagnosis and treatment of uterine cancer. The p53
test shall be in addition to any other test that may be performed on an abnormal
cytological or histological endometrial sample.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.